Massachusetts, session 194th, H2540.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding chapter 111 of the General Laws, or any other general or special law to
the contrary, the department of public health shall waive the community-based health initiative
requirement for the construction of a nursing facility that will have a geropsychiatric unit for any
applicant that had to file a determination of need to meet the department of public health’s de-
densifying requirements.
of 1